Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-1415
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the general welfare and well-being of the state are directly related to educational levels and skills of the citizens of the state and that a vital and valid public purpose is served by the creation and implementation of programs which encourage and make possible the attainment of higher levels of education by the greatest number of citizens of the state. The state has limited resources to provide additional programs for education funding and the continued operation and maintenance of the state's public institutions of elementary, secondary, and postsecondary education, and the general welfare of the citizens of the state will be enhanced by establishing a program which allows parents and others interested in the education of our youth to invest money in a public trust for future application to the payment of qualified education expenses. The creation of the means of encouragement for persons to invest in such a program represents the carrying out of a vital and valid public purpose. In order to make available to parents and others interested in the education of our youth an opportunity to fund future education needs, it is necessary that a public trust be established in which money may be invested for future educational use.

Laws 2000, LB 1003, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB197, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-1801;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 40.